Massachusetts, session 194th, H916.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1.  Title II of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after chapter 
2 21O the following chapter:- 
3  CHAPTER 21P: PLASTIC BAG REDUCTION 
4  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings 
5 unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
6  “Carryout bag”, a bag that is provided to a customer to carry items purchased from or 
7 serviced by a retail establishment. A carryout bag does not include the following: (i) a bag 
8 provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing prescription medication; (ii) a bag used to 
9 protect items from damaging or contaminating other purchased items placed in a recycled paper 
10 bag or a reusable grocery bag; (iii) a bag provided to contain an unwrapped food item; (iv) a bag 
11 to protect articles of clothing on a hanger; (v) a bag to prevent frozen food items, including ice 
12 cream, from thawing; (vi) a bag to protect small items from loss. 

2 of 31 13  “Postconsumer recycled material”, a material that would otherwise be destined for solid 
14 waste disposal, having completed its intended end use and product life cycle. Postconsumer 
15 recycled material does not include materials and byproducts generated from, and commonly 
16 reused within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process. 
17  “Recycled paper bag”, a paper bag that is (i) 100 per cent recyclable; (ii) contains a 
18 minimum of 40 per cent postconsumer recycled materials, provided, however, that an 8 pound or 
19 smaller recycled paper bag shall contain a minimum of 20 per cent postconsumer recycled 
20 material; and (iii) displays the words "Recyclable" and "made from 40% post-consumer recycled 
21 content" or other applicable amount in a visible manner on the outside of the bag. 
22  “Reusable grocery bag”, a bag that is not a plastic film bag, has handles that are stitched 
23 and not heat fused, and that is made of machine-washable cloth, hemp, or other woven or non-
24 woven fibers, fabrics, or materials that are at least 45 grams per square meter, designed and 
25 manufactured specifically for multiple uses. 
26  “Single-use carryout bag”, a carryout bag made of plastic, paper, or other material that is 
27 provided by a Retail establishment to a customer at the point of sale and that is not a recycled 
28 paper bag or a reusable grocery bag. 
29  “Retail establishment”, a store or premises in which a person is engaged in the retail 
30 business of selling or providing merchandise, goods, groceries, prepared take-out food and 
31 beverages for consumption off-premises or the servicing of an item, directly to customers at such 
32 store or premises, including, but not limited to, grocery stores, department stores, pharmacies, 
33 convenience stores, restaurants, coffee shops and seasonal and temporary businesses, including 
34 farmers markets and public markets; provided, however, that a “retail establishment” shall also 

3 of 31 35 include a food truck or other motor vehicle, mobile canteen, trailer, market pushcart or moveable 
36 roadside stand used by a person from which to engage in such business directly with customers 
37 and business establishments without a storefront, including, but not limited to, a business 
38 delivering prepared foods or other food items, web-based or catalog business or delivery services 
39 used by a retail establishment; provided further, that a “retail establishment” shall include a non-
40 profit organization, charity or religious institution that has a retail establishment and holds itself 
41 out to the public as engaging in retail activities that are characteristic of similar type retail 
42 businesses, whether or not for profit when engaging in such activity; provided further that a 
43 “retail establishment” shall include K-12 food service operations or institutional cafeterias, 
44 including those operated by or on behalf of any government entity. 
45  Section 2. (a) Eighteen months after the enactment of this law, a Retail establishment 
46 shall not sell or otherwise distribute to a customer a carryout out bag that is not: a (i) reusable 
47 grocery bag, or (ii) recycled paper bag. 
48  (b) For up to 180 days from the date of enactment, a Retail establishment may make 
49 available a single-use carryout bag, reusable grocery bag, or recycled paper bag to a customer. 
50  (c) From 180 days to eighteen months after the enactment of this law, if a Retail 
51 establishment makes available a single-use carryout bag, recycled paper bag, or reusable grocery 
52 bag to a customer, the price of a single-use carryout bag, recycled paper bag, or reusable grocery 
53 bag shall be not less than $0.10 each. 
54  (d) From eighteen months after the enactment of this law, if a Retail establishment makes 
55 available a recycled paper bag or a reusable grocery bag to a customer, the price of a recycled 
56 paper bag or a reusable grocery bag shall be not less than $0.10 each. 

4 of 31 57  (e) All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be retained by the Retail 
58 establishment. 
59  (f) Subsections (a)-(d) shall not apply to any type of bag used by a Retail establishment or 
60 provided by a retail establishment to a customer for: (i) providing or distributing prepared foods, 
61 groceries or articles of clothing at no cost or at a substantially reduced cost by a nonprofit 
62 organization, charity or religious institution, or (ii) any item that requires the use of a certain type 
63 of bag under federal or state law. 
64  (g) The department of environmental protection shall promulgate regulations with regard 
65 to the enforcement of this chapter. The department of environmental protection shall establish a 
66 small business exemption process by which a Retail establishment may elect to be exempt from 
67 the provisions of subsections (b) through (d) of this section. A Retail establishment electing for 
68 said exemption must upon request submit to the department of environmental protection a self-
69 audit attesting that they meet the following criteria: 
70  1.the owner of the Retail establishment has 3 or fewer store locations under the same 
71 ownership; and 
72  2.each Retail establishment has less than 4,000 square feet of retail selling space; and 
73  3.each Retail establishment has 15 or fewer employees employed at the store location; 
74 and either 
75  4.the Retail establishment is not a food establishment as defined by 105 CMR 
76 590.001(C); or 

5 of 31 77  5.the Retail establishment provided to consumers at the point of sale less than 15,000 
78 carry-out bags or checkout bags in total during the previous calendar year. 
79  (h) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a customer from bringing a personal bag, made 
80 or comprised of any material, to a retail establishment to carry out items purchased from or 
81 serviced by the retail establishment. 
82  (i) A retail establishment shall not be prohibited from selling or offering for sale to 
83 customers: (i) any package containing several bags, including, but not limited to, food bags, 
84 sandwich bags, yard waste bags, garbage bags or municipal pay-as-you-throw program trash 
85 bags; (ii) any product, merchandise or good with a protective bag, a bag to hold related 
86 accessories, parts or instruction manuals or a bag used as product packaging that the retail 
87 establishment received with such item or product from the manufacturer, distributor or vendor; 
88 or (iii) any bag that is not a retail type carryout bag that is sold or offered for sale as a product or 
89 merchandise, including, but not limited to, sports bags, handbags, equipment bags, tent bags or 
90 other bags specifically designed to protect or contain a particular item. 
91  (j) Notwithstanding subsections (c)-(d) and to the extent permitted under federal and state 
92 law, a retail establishment that makes available for purchase a recycled paper bag at the point of 
93 sale shall not charge a fee for the bag to a customer using an electronic benefit transfer card as 
94 payment. 
95  Section 3. This chapter shall preempt any limitation by any political subdivision of the 
96 commonwealth regarding the use, sale or distribution of carryout bags by a Retail establishment 
97 to the extent that it is regulated or covered by this chapter. Any part of a municipal ordinance, 

6 of 31 98 bylaw or regulation, including a regulation of a board of health, that is inconsistent with this 
99 chapter shall be null and void 180 days after the enactment of this law. 
100  Section 4. (a) Each city and town shall enforce this chapter through its enforcing 
101 authority as determined under subsection (c). 
102  (b) A retail establishment that violates this chapter shall be subject to a warning for the 
103 first violation, a civil penalty of up to $500 for the second violation and a civil penalty of up to 
104 $1000 for a third or subsequent violation. Each day a retail establishment is in violation of this 
105 chapter shall be considered a separate violation. Each city and town shall dispose of a civil 
106 violation under this subsection by the non-criminal method of disposition procedures contained 
107 in section 21D of chapter 40 without an enabling ordinance or bylaw. 
108  (c) Each city and town shall designate the municipal board, department or official 
109 responsible for the local enforcement of this chapter and for the collection of money resulting 
110 from civil penalties assessed for violations of this chapter. A city or town shall retain any civil 
111 penalties collected for such violations. 
112  Section 5. The department of environmental protection may through regulation: (i) 
113 increase or adjust the postconsumer recycled material percentage in a recycled paper bag; (ii) 
114 increase or adjust the fee established under subsections (c)-(d) of section 2; (iii) allow a retail 
115 establishment to use other non-plastic type carryout bags that are recyclable or compostable, 
116 provided however that such regulations shall not be implemented prior to the universal 
117 availability of a safe disposal route for compostable bags and, provided further, that the 
118 department shall seek public comment on said proposed regulations; and (iv) promulgate 
119 standards regulating bags authorized under subsection (b) of section 2. 

7 of 31 120  The department of environmental protection shall, when adopting or amending any 
121 standard for an allowed recycled or reusable bag under this chapter, consult with the department 
122 of public health on issues relating to food safety and the materials used to produce the bags. 
123  The department of environmental protection shall conduct an evaluation of the 
124 implementation of this act every three years and shall submit to the clerks of the senate and the 
125 house of representatives a report including legislative recommendations not later than December 
126 31. 
127  Section 6. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit or limit the department of environmental 
128 protection’s authority to enforce this chapter. 
129  Section 7. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
130 transitional assistance shall, if necessary to implement subsection (j) of section 2 of chapter 21P 
131 of the General Laws, use reasonable efforts to seek a waiver from the federal Food and Nutrition 
132 Service to implement said subsection (j) of said section 2 of said chapter 21P. 
133  SECTION 2. Reduce Polystyrene in the Environment 
134  The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21P the following 
135 chapter: 
136  Chapter 21Q. 
137  Section 1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the 
138 following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
139  “Disposable Food Service Ware” shall mean single-use or disposable products for 
140 heating, storing, packaging, serving, consuming or transporting prepared or ready-to-consume 

8 of 31 141 food or beverages including, but not limited to, bowls, plates, trays, cartons, cups, lids, hinged or 
142 lidded containers, spoons, forks and knives. This includes any containers used by food 
143 establishments to heat, cook or store food or beverages prior to serving, regardless of whether 
144 such containers are used to serve such food or beverages. Disposable Food Service Ware also 
145 includes any such implements sold by Retail Establishments to consumers for personal use. 
146  “Foam Polystyrene” shall mean polystyrene in the form of a foam or expanded material, 
147 processed by any number of techniques including, but not limited to, fusion of polymer spheres 
148 (expandable bead polystyrene), injection molding, foam molding, and extrusion-blow molding 
149 (extruded foam polystyrene). 
150  “Food Establishment” shall mean any operation that serves, vends or otherwise provides 
151 food or other products to third-parties for consumption and/or use on or off the premises, 
152 whether or not a fee is charged, but not including the service of food within a home or other 
153 private setting. Any facility requiring a food permit in accordance with the Massachusetts State 
154 Food Code, 105 CMR 590.000, et seq. and/or regulations of the Board of Health shall be 
155 considered a “food establishment” for purposes of this chapter. 
156  “Health Agent” shall mean the Health Agent for the city or town of the facility, or his/her 
157 designee. 
158  “Packing Material” shall mean material used to hold, cushion, or protect items packed in 
159 a container for shipping transport or storage. 
160  “Prepared Food” shall mean food or beverages, which are serviced, packaged, cooked, 
161 chopped, sliced, mixed, brewed, frozen, squeezed, or otherwise prepared (collectively 

9 of 31 162 “prepared”) for individual customers or consumers. Prepared Food does not include raw eggs or 
163 raw, butchered meats, fish, seafood, and/or poultry. 
164  “Polystyrene” shall mean a synthetic polymer produced by polymerization of styrene 
165 monomer. Polystyrene includes both “Foam Polystyrene” and “Solid Polystyrene” as defined in 
166 this chapter. The International Resin Identification Code assigned to polystyrene materials is “6”. 
167 Polystyrene items may be identified by a "6" or "PS," either alone or in combination with other 
168 letters. The regulations and prohibitions relating to polystyrene in this law are intended to apply 
169 regardless of the presence or absence of an International Resin Identification Code or other 
170 identifying marks on the item. 
171  “Retail Establishment” shall mean a store or premises engaged in the retail business of 
172 selling or providing merchandise, goods, groceries, prepared take-out food and beverages for 
173 consumption off-premises or the serving of an item directly to customers at such store or 
174 premises, including, but not limited to, grocery stores, department stores, pharmacies, 
175 convenience stores, restaurants, coffee shops and seasonal and temporary businesses, including 
176 farmers markets and public markets; provided, however, that a “retail establishment” shall also 
177 include a food truck or other motor vehicle, mobile canteen, trailer, market pushcart or moveable 
178 roadside stand used by a person from which to engage in such business directly with customers 
179 and business establishments without a storefront, including, but not limited to, a business 
180 delivering prepared foods or other food items, web-based or catalog business or delivery services 
181 used by a retail establishment; provided further, that a “retail establishment” shall include a non-
182 profit organization, charity or religious institution that has a retail establishment and holds itself 
183 out to the public as engaging in retail activities that are characteristic of similar type commercial 
184 retail businesses, whether or not for profit when engaging in such activity. 

10 of 31 185  “Solid Polystyrene” shall mean polystyrene, including clear (oriented) polystyrene, 
186 produced in a rigid form with minimal incorporation of air or other gas. Solid polystyrene is also 
187 referred to as ‘rigid polystyrene’. 
188  Section 2. Regulated Conduct 
189  a. One year after passage of this Act, no Food Establishment in the Commonwealth of 
190 Massachusetts may use, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute disposable food service ware 
191 made from foam polystyrene or solid polystyrene. 
192  b. One year after passage of this Act, no Retail Establishment in the Commonwealth of 
193 Massachusetts may sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute: 1. disposable food service ware 
194 made from foam polystyrene or solid polystyrene 2. meat trays, fish trays, seafood trays, 
195 vegetable trays, or egg cartons made in whole or in any part with foam polystyrene or solid 
196 polystyrene 3. distributing packing materials, including packing peanuts, other loose fill 
197 packaging and shipping boxes made in whole or in any part with foam polystyrene. 4. coolers, 
198 ice chests, or similar containers; pool or beach toys; and dock floats, mooring buoys, or anchor 
199 or navigation markers, which are made in whole or in any part with foam polystyrene that is not 
200 wholly encapsulated within a more durable material. 
201  c. For the purposes of Section 2(b)(3), ‘distributing packing material’ does not include: 1. 
202 Re-using packing materials for shipping, transport, or storage within the same distribution 
203 system, where the packing materials are not sent to a customer or end user. 2. Receiving 
204 shipments within the Commonwealth that include polystyrene foam used as a packing material, 
205 provided that the goods were not packaged or repackaged within the Commonwealth of 
206 Massachusetts. 

11 of 31 207  Section 3. Exemption 
208  a. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit individuals from using disposable food service 
209 ware or other items made of polystyrene purchased outside the Commonwealth of Massachusetts 
210 for personal use. b) Prepared food packaged outside the Commonwealth of Massachusetts is 
211 exempt from the provisions of this chapter, provided that it is sold or otherwise provided to the 
212 consumer in the same disposable food service ware in which it was originally packaged, and that 
213 the prepared food has not been altered or repackaged. c) The Commonwealth of Massachusetts 
214 Department of Environmental Protection or the Board of Health of the city or town in which the 
215 food or retail establishment is located may exempt a food establishment or retail establishment 
216 from any provision of this chapter for a period of up to six months upon written application by 
217 the owner or operator of that establishment. No exemption will be granted unless the Department 
218 of Environmental Protection or the Board of Health finds that (1) strict enforcement of the 
219 provision for which the exemption is sought would cause undue hardship; or (2) the food 
220 establishment or retail establishment requires additional time in order to draw down an existing 
221 inventory of a specific item regulated by this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, “undue 
222 hardship” shall mean a situation unique to a food establishment or retail establishment in which 
223 there are no reasonable alternatives to the use of materials prohibited by this chapter, and that 
224 compliance with this chapter would create significant economic hardship for the Establishment 
225  Section 4. Enforcement 
226  Health Agents of the cities and towns of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall also 
227 have the authority to enforce this chapter. This chapter may be enforced through any lawful 
228 means in law or in equity, including but not limited to, noncriminal disposition pursuant to G.L. 

12 of 31 229 c. 40 § 21D. The town or city may enforce this chapter or enjoin violations thereof through any 
230 lawful process or combination of processes, and the election of one remedy by the town or city 
231 shall not preclude enforcement through any other lawful means. Violations of this chapter are 
232 punishable by a fine of up to $500 per violation. Each successive day of noncompliance will 
233 count as a separate violation. 
234  If non-criminal disposition is elected, then any Food or Retail Establishment that violates 
235 any provision of this chapter shall be subject to the following penalties: (i) first offense: written 
236 warning;(ii) second offense: $250 penalty, and (iii) third and each subsequent offense: $500 
237 penalty. 
238  Section 5. Regulations 
239  The Board of Health may adopt and amend rules and regulations to effectuate the 
240 purposes of this chapter. 
241  Section 6. Interaction with Other Laws 
242  In the case of a conflict between the requirements of this chapter and any other federal, 
243 state or local law concerning the materials regulated herein, the more stringent requirements shall 
244 apply. 
245  Section 7. Severability 
246  If any provision of this chapter is declared invalid or unenforceable the other provisions 
247 shall not be affected thereby. 
248  SECTION 3. Reduce Plastic Straws in the Environment 

13 of 31 249  The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21Q the following 
250 chapter: 
251  Chapter 21R. 
252  Section 1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the 
253 following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
254  “Disability” shall mean a physical, intellectual, or sensory impairment that substantially 
255 limits one or more major life activities. 
256  “Disposable plastic straw, stirrer, or splash stick” shall mean a drinking straw, stirrer, or 
257 splash stick made predominantly from synthetic polymers and that is not a reusable straw, stirrer, 
258 or splash stick. A disposable plastic straw, stirrer, or splash stick shall also include items made in 
259 whole or in part from synthetic polymers that are otherwise classified as ‘compostable’, 
260 ‘biodegradable’, ‘oxodegradable’, or ‘marine degradable’. 
261  “Food Establishment” shall mean any operation that serves, vends or otherwise provides 
262 food or other products to third-parties for consumption and/or use on or off the premises, 
263 whether or not a fee is charged, but not including the service of food within a home or other 
264 private setting. Any facility requiring a food permit in accordance with the Massachusetts State 
265 Food Code, 105 CMR 590.000, et seq. and/or regulations of the Board of Health shall be 
266 considered a “food establishment” for purposes of this bylaw. 
267  “Health Agent” shall mean the Health Agent for the city or town of the facility or his/her 
268 designee. 

14 of 31 269  “Medical Condition” shall mean any illness, disease, or injury that requires medical 
270 treatment. 
271  “Reusable straw, stirrer, or splash stick” shall mean a drinking straw, stirrer, or splash 
272 stick that is manufactured from durable materials, and is designed to be adequately and 
273 repeatedly cleaned and sanitized for reuse. 
274  “Retail Establishment” shall mean a store or premises engaged in the retail business of 
275 selling or providing merchandise, goods, groceries, prepared take-out food and beverages for 
276 consumption off-premises or the serving of an item, directly to customers at such store or 
277 premises, including, but not limited to, grocery stores, department stores, clothing stores, 
278 pharmacies, convenience stores, restaurants, coffee shops and seasonal and temporary 
279 businesses, including farmers markets and public markets; provided, however, that a “retail 
280 establishment” shall also include a food truck or other motor vehicle, mobile canteen, trailer, 
281 market pushcart or moveable roadside stand used by a person from which to engage in such 
282 business directly with customers and business establishments without a storefront, including, but 
283 not limited to, a business delivering prepared foods or other food items, web-based or catalog 
284 business or delivery services used by a retail establishment; provided further, that a “retail 
285 establishment” shall include a non-profit organization, charity or religious institution that has a 
286 retail establishment and holds itself out to the public as engaging in retail activities that are 
287 characteristic of similar type commercial retail businesses, whether or not for profit when 
288 engaging in such activity. 
289  Section 2. Regulated Conduct 

15 of 31 290  a. One year after passage of this Act, no food establishment in the Commonwealth of 
291 Massachusetts may provide a disposable plastic straw, stirrer, or splash stick, as such term is 
292 defined in this chapter, to a customer. 
293  b. One year after passage of this Act, no food establishment in the Commonwealth of 
294 Massachusetts may provide a disposable straw, stirrer, or splash stick that is not a reusable straw, 
295 stirrer, or splash stick to a customer, except upon that customer’s specific request for such items 
296 or if the item is selected by a customer from a self-service dispenser. 
297  c. One year after passage of this Act, retail establishments in the Commonwealth of 
298 Massachusetts are prohibited from selling or distributing disposable plastic straws, stirrers, or 
299 splash sticks to customers unless equivalent non-plastic or reusable straws, stirrers, or splash 
300 sticks are available for sale and are clearly labeled such that any customer can easily distinguish 
301 among the disposable plastic, disposable non-plastic, and reusable items. 
302  Section 3. Exemptions 
303  a. Nothing in this bylaw shall prohibit individuals from bringing and using their own 
304 personal straws, stirrers, or splash sticks of any type for personal use in a food establishment. b. 
305 Food establishments may provide a disposable plastic straw, stirrer, or splash stick, upon request, 
306 to a person in need due to a disability or medical condition. c. The Department of Environmental 
307 Protections or the Board of Health or health agent of the city or town in which the establishment 
308 is located may exempt a food establishment or retail establishment from any provision of this 
309 chapter for a period of up to six months upon written application by the owner or operator of that 
310 establishment. No exemption will be granted unless the Department or the Board of Health or 

16 of 31 311  health agent finds that the establishment requires additional time in order to draw down 
312 an existing inventory of a specific item regulated by this chapter. 
313  Section 4. Enforcement 
314  Health Agents shall have the authority to enforce this bylaw. This bylaw may be enforced 
315 through any lawful means in law or in equity, including but not limited to, noncriminal 
316 disposition pursuant to G.L. c. 40 § 21D and Article VI of the General Bylaws. The city or town 
317 may enforce this chapter or enjoin violations thereof through any lawful process or combination 
318 of processes, and the election of one remedy by the city or town shall not preclude enforcement 
319 through any other lawful means. 
320  Violations of this bylaw are punishable by a fine of up to $300 per violation. Each 
321 successive day of noncompliance will count as a separate violation. 
322  If non-criminal disposition is elected, then any Food Establishment or Retail 
323 Establishment that violates any provision of this bylaw shall be subject to the following 
324 penalties: (i) first offense: written warning, (ii) second offense: $50 penalty, and (iii) third and 
325 each subsequent offense: $300 penalty. 
326  Section 5. Regulations 
327  The Board of Health may adopt and amend rules and regulations to effectuate the 
328 purposes of this chapter. 
329  Section 6. Interaction with Other Laws 

17 of 31 330  In the case of a conflict between the requirements of this chapter and any other federal, 
331 state or local law concerning the materials regulated herein, the more stringent requirements shall 
332 apply. 
333  Section 7. Severability 
334  If any provision of this chapter is declared invalid or unenforceable the other provisions 
335 shall not be affected thereby. 
336  SECTION 4. To Prevent the Release of Helium Balloons into the Environment 
337  Chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 official edition, is hereby 
338 amended by adding the following new section: 
339  Section 119. The sale, distribution and release of any type of balloon, including, but not 
340 limited to, plastic or latex, filled with any type of lighter than air gas, both for public or private 
341 use, is hereby prohibited. Whoever violates any provision of this section shall be punished by a 
342 fine of not more than one hundred dollars. 
343  The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) balloons released by or on behalf of 
344 any agency of the commonwealth or the United States for scientific or meteorological purposes, 
345 or (ii) hot air balloons that are recovered after launch. 
346  SECTION 5. To Prevent the Release of Nips into the Environment 
347  One year after passage of this Act, the sale of alcoholic beverages in containers less than 
348 or equal to 100 milliliters is prohibited within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. 
349  SECTION 6. To Prevent the Release of Wipes Containing Plastic into the Environment 

18 of 31 350  Section 1. For purposes of this section, the following definition shall apply: 
351  “Plastic Wipe”, a nonwoven disposable product manufactured and sold in this state or 
352 brought into the state for sale that is constructed from plastic resin (including, but not limited to, 
353 polyester and polypropylene) nonwoven sheets, including moist toilet tissue or cloth, that is 
354 designed, marketed to or commonly used by the general public for personal hygiene or cleaning 
355 purposes, including, but not limited to, diaper wipes, toilet wipes, household cleaning wipes, 
356 personal care wipes and facial wipes. 
357  Section 2. No retailer shall sell or distribute plastic wet wipes other than those used for 
358 medical applications. 
359  Section 3. This law shall not affect prescription products. 
360  SECTION 7. To Prevent the Release of Hotel Toiletry Bottles into the Environment 
361  Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply: 
362  (1) “Hosted rental” means a house, apartment, or other livable space where the person 
363 providing sleeping accommodations is a permanent resident who lives on the premises. 
364  (2) “Lodging establishment” means an establishment that contains one or more sleeping 
365 room accommodations that are rented or otherwise provided to the public, including, but not 
366 limited to, a hotel, motel, resort, bed and breakfast inn, or vacation rental. “Lodging 
367 establishment” does not include a hospital, nursing home, residential retirement community, 
368 prison, jail, homeless shelter, boarding school, worker housing, long-term rental, or hosted 
369 rental. 

19 of 31 370  (3) “Personal care product” means a product intended to be applied to or used on the 
371 human body in the shower, bath, or any part thereof and shall include only shampoo, hair 
372 conditioner, and bath soap. 
373  (4) “Plastic” means any synthetic material made from organic polymers, such as 
374 polyethylene, polyvinyl chloride (PVC), or nylon, that can be molded into shape while soft and 
375 then set into a rigid or slightly elastic form. “Plastic” includes all materials identified with resin 
376 codes 1 to 7, inclusive. 
377  (5) “Small plastic bottle” means a plastic bottle or container with less than a 6-ounce 
378 capacity that is intended to be nonreusable by the end user. 
379  (b) Commencing one year from the passage of this act for lodging establishments with 
380 more than 50 rooms, and two years from the passage of this act for lodging establishments with 
381 50 rooms or less, a lodging establishment shall not provide a small plastic bottle containing a 
382 personal care product to a person staying in a sleeping room accommodation, in any space within 
383 the sleeping room accommodation, or within bathrooms shared by the public or guests. 
384  (c) A lodging establishment is encouraged to use bulk dispensers of personal care 
385 products to reduce plastic waste and lower operating costs, mindful of the health and safety of a 
386 person. 
387  (d) A lodging establishment may provide personal care products in small plastic bottles to 
388 a person at no cost, upon request, at a place other than a sleeping room accommodation, a space 
389 within the sleeping room accommodation, or within bathrooms shared by the public or guests. 

20 of 31 390  (e) A local agency with authority to inspect sleeping accommodations in a lodging 
391 establishment may issue a citation for a violation of subdivision (b). Upon a first violation, the 
392 local Board of Health shall issue a written warning, which shall recite the violation and advise 
393 that subsequent violations may result in citations. Upon a second or subsequent violation, the 
394 local agency may impose a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the lodging 
395 establishment is in violation, but not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) annually. 
396  (f) A lodging establishment in violation of subdivision (b) is liable for a civil penalty of 
397 five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation and two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a second 
398 or subsequent violation. 
399  (g) (1) On and after one year from the passage of this act, a city, county, or city and 
400 county shall not pass or enforce an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule relating to personal 
401 care products in plastic bottles provided at lodging establishments, except as provided in 
402 paragraph (2). 
403  Section 2. A city, county, or city and county that, before the passage of this act, passed an 
404 ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule relating to personal care products in plastic bottles 
405 provided at lodging establishments may enforce that ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule, if 
406 it is at least as stringent as, and not in conflict with, this section. 
407  SECTION 8. To Prevent the Release of Plastic Water Bottles Into the Environment 
408  Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply: 
409  "Single-serve plastic container" means a container with a volume of 1 litter or less made 
410 in whole or in part of plastic resin codes 1 through 6 (excluding the label or cap). 

21 of 31 411  "Bottled Water" means non-sparkling, unflavored drinking water. 
412  Section 2. Restrictions 
413  No retailer shall sell or distribute any bottled water in a single-serve plastic container 
414 other than nutritive drinks, tea, coffee, or unflavored carbonated water. 
415  Section 3. Exclusions 
416  Sales or distribution of drinking water in plastic bottles occurring subsequent to a 
417 declaration by a duly authorized Town, state or Federal official of an emergency affecting the 
418 availability and/or quality of drinking water to residents of the Town shall be exempt from this 
419 bylaw until seven days after the declaration has ended. 
420  Section 4. Effective Date 
421  The provisions of this law shall take effect one year after passage of this Act. 
422  SECTION 9. To Prevent the Release of Black Plastic into the Environment 
423  The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21R the following 
424 chapter: 
425  Chapter 21S. 
426  Section 1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the 
427 following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
428  “Disposable Food Service Ware” shall mean single-use or disposable products for 
429 heating, storing, packaging, serving, consuming, or transporting prepared or ready-to-consume 

22 of 31 430 food or beverages including, but not limited to, bowls, plates, trays, cartons, cups, lids, hinged or 
431 lidded containers, spoons, forks and knives. This includes any containers used by food 
432 establishments to heat, cook, or store food or beverages prior to serving, regardless of whether 
433 such containers are used to serve such food or beverages. Disposable Food Service Ware also 
434 includes any such implements sold by Retail Establishments to consumers for personal use. 
435  “Black Plastic” shall mean any plastic with any plastic resin codes #1-#7. 
436  “Food Establishment” shall mean any operation that serves, vends or otherwise provides 
437 food or other products to third-parties for consumption and/or use on or off the premises, 
438 whether or not a fee is charged, but not including the service of food within a home or other 
439 private setting. Any facility requiring a food permit in accordance with the Massachusetts State 
440 Food Code, 105 CMR 590.000, et seq. and/or regulations of the Board of Health shall be 
441 considered a “food establishment” for purposes of this bylaw. 
442  “Health Agent” shall mean the Health Agent for the city or town of the facility or his/her 
443 designee. 
444  “Prepared Food” shall mean food or beverages, which are serviced, packaged, cooked, 
445 chopped, sliced, mixed, brewed, frozen, squeezed, or otherwise prepared (collectively 
446 “prepared”) for individual customers or consumers. Prepared Food does not include raw eggs or 
447 raw, butchered meats, fish, seafood, and/or poultry. 
448  “Retail Establishment” shall mean a store or premises engaged in the retail business of 
449 selling or providing merchandise, goods, groceries, prepared take-out food and beverages for 
450 consumption off-premises or the serving of an item directly to customers at such store or 
451 premises, including, but not limited to, grocery stores, department stores, pharmacies, 

23 of 31 452  convenience stores, restaurants, coffee shops and seasonal and temporary businesses, 
453 including farmers markets and public markets; provided, however, that a “retail establishment” 
454 shall also include a food truck or other motor vehicle, mobile canteen, trailer, market pushcart or 
455 moveable roadside stand used by a person from which to engage in such business directly with 
456 customers and business establishments without a storefront, including, but not limited to, a 
457 business delivering prepared foods or other food items, web-based or catalog business or 
458 delivery services used by a retail establishment; provided further, that a “retail establishment” 
459 shall include a non-profit organization, charity or religious institution that has a retail 
460 establishment and holds itself out to the public as engaging in retail activities that are 
461 characteristic of similar type commercial retail businesses, whether or not for profit when 
462 engaging in such activity. 
463  Section 2. Regulated Conduct 
464  a. One year after passage of this Act, no Food Establishment in the Commonwealth of 
465 Massachusetts may use, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute disposable food service ware 
466 made from black plastic. 
467  b. One year after passage of this Act, no Retail Establishment in the Commonwealth of 
468 Massachusetts may sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute: 1. disposable food service ware 
469 made from black plastic. 2. meat trays, fish trays, seafood trays, vegetable trays, or egg cartons 
470 made in whole or in any part with black plastic. 
471  Section 3. Exemption 
472  a) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit individuals from using disposable food service 
473 ware or other items made of black plastic purchased outside the Commonwealth of 

24 of 31 474 Massachusetts for personal use. b) Prepared food packaged outside the Commonwealth of 
475 Massachusetts is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, provided that it is sold or otherwise 
476 provided to the consumer in the same disposable food service ware in which it was originally 
477 packaged, and that the prepared food has not been altered or repackaged. c) The Commonwealth 
478 of Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection or the Board of Health of the city or 
479 town in which the food or retail establishment is located may exempt a food establishment or 
480 retail establishment from any provision of this chapter for a period of up to six months upon 
481 written application by the owner or operator of that establishment. No exemption will be granted 
482 unless the Department of Environmental Protection or the Board of Health finds that (1) strict 
483 enforcement of the provision for which the exemption is sought would cause undue hardship; or 
484 (2) the food establishment or retail establishment requires additional time in order to draw down 
485 an existing inventory of a specific item regulated by this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, 
486 “undue hardship” shall mean a situation unique to a food establishment or retail establishment in 
487 which there are no reasonable alternatives to the use of materials prohibited by this chapter, and 
488 that compliance with this chapter would create significant economic hardship for the 
489 Establishment. 
490  Section 4. Enforcement 
491  Health Agents of the cities and towns of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall also 
492 have the authority to enforce this chapter. This chapter may be enforced through any lawful 
493 means in law or in equity, including but not limited to, noncriminal disposition pursuant to G.L. 
494 c. 40 § 21D and Article VI of the General Bylaws. The town or city may enforce this chapter or 
495 enjoin violations thereof through any lawful process or combination of processes, and the 

25 of 31 496 election of one remedy by the town or city shall not preclude enforcement through any other 
497 lawful means. 
498  Violations of this chapter are punishable by a fine of up to $300 per violation. Each 
499 successive day of noncompliance will count as a separate violation. 
500  If non-criminal disposition is elected, then any Food or Retail Establishment that violates 
501 any provision of this chapter shall be subject to the following penalties: 
502  First Offense: written warning 
503  Second Offense: $50 penalty 
504  Third and each subsequent offense: $300 penalty 
505  Section 5. Regulations 
506  The Board of Health may adopt and amend rules and regulations to effectuate the 
507 purposes of this chapter. 
508  Section 6. Interaction with Other Laws 
509  In the case of a conflict between the requirements of this chapter and any other federal, 
510 state or local law concerning the materials regulated herein, the more stringent requirements shall 
511 apply. 
512  Section 7. Severability 
513  If any provision of this chapter is declared invalid or unenforceable the other provisions 
514 shall not be affected thereby. 

26 of 31 515  SECTION 10. To Support Our Restaurants 
516  Section 1. For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following 
517 definitions: 
518  (a) “Disposable”, means designed to be discarded after a single or limited number of uses 
519 and not designed or manufactured for long-term multiple reuse. 
520  (b) “Food service ware accessories”, include food service ware such as straws, stirrers, 
521 cup spill plugs, cup sleeves, condiments and condiment packets, utensils (including chopsticks), 
522 cocktail sticks/picks, toothpicks, napkins, and other similar accessory or accompanying food 
523 service ware used as part of food or beverage service or packaging. Detachable lids for beverage 
524 cups and food containers are not considered a food service ware accessory. 
525  (c) “Food facility”, means an operation that stores, prepares, packages, serves, vends, or 
526 otherwise provides food to the public for human consumption. 
527  (d) “Takeout food”, means prepared food requiring no further preparation, which is 
528 purchased to be consumed off a prepared food facility’s premises. Takeout food includes 
529 prepared food delivered by a food facility or by a third-party takeout food delivery service. 
530  (e) “Takeout food delivery service”, is a service that delivers takeout food from a food 
531 facility to a customer for consumption off the premises. This service can be provided directly by 
532 the food facility or by a third party. 
533  Section 2. 
534  (a) No food facility shall provide any disposable food service ware accessories except: 

27 of 31 535  1. Upon request by the consumer; 
536  2. Upon acceptance by the consumer after being offered by the food facility; or 
537  3. At a self-serve area and/or a dispenser. 
538  (b) Food facilities shall only distribute disposable food service ware if they charge the 
539 customer what that food ware cost the food facility, or a dollar, whichever is greater. 
540  (c) Takeout food delivery services that utilize digital ordering/point of sale platforms, 
541 including but not limited to the internet and smartphones, shall only offer disposable food service 
542 ware accessories by providing clear options for customers to affirmatively request these items 
543 separate from orders for food and beverages. The default option on the digital ordering/point of 
544 sale platforms shall be that no disposable food service ware accessories are requested. Each 
545 individual disposable food service ware accessory (e.g., each fork, knife, condiment packet, 
546 napkin, etc.) provided with prepared food must be specifically requested by the customer in order 
547 for a food facility to provide it. 
548  (d) Takeout food delivery services shall only distribute disposable food service ware if 
549 they charge the customer what that food ware cost the food facility, or a dollar, whichever is 
550 greater. 
551  SECTION 11. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21O the 
552 following chapter: 
553  CHAPTER 21P. 
554  IMPROVED PLASTIC BOTTLES AND INCREASED RECYCLING 

28 of 31 555  Section 1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the 
556 following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
557  (a) “Beverage”, any of the following products prepared for immediate consumption and 
558 sold in a single-use container: beer and malt beverages; wine distilled spirit coolers; carbonated 
559 water and soda; noncarbonated water; carbonated soft drinks; noncarbonated soft drinks and 
560 ‘soft’ drinks; non-carbonated fruit drinks that contain any percentage of fruit juice and vegetable 
561 juice; coffee and tea drinks; carbonated fruit drinks; vegetable and fruit juice, sports drinks, 
562 fermented non-alcoholic drinks; 
563  (b) “Beverage cap”, a cap on any plastic beverage container that is made wholly or in 
564 large part from plastic; 
565  (c) “Plastic beverage container”, an individual, separate bottle, can, jar, carton, or other 
566 receptacle, however denominated, in which one liter or less of a beverage is sold, and that is 
567 constructed of plastic. “Beverage container” does not include a cup or other similar container 
568 open or loosely sealed receptacle; 
569  (d) “The Department” means the Department of Environmental Protection for the 
570 Commonwealth of Massachusetts; 
571  (e) “Plastic”, an organic or petroleum derivative synthetic or a semisynthetic organic 
572 solid that is moldable, and to which additives or other substances may have been added, with the 
573 exception of natural polymers that have not been chemically modified; 
574  (f) “Product manufacturer” means any person, partnership, association, corporation or 
575 any other entity that, through its own action or through contract or control, is primarily 

29 of 31 576 responsible for causing a product to be produced that is held inside of a rigid plastic packaging 
577 container and sold or offered for sale in Massachusetts. 
578  i. The Department shall consider the following factors in identifying a product 
579 manufacturer: (1) the ownership of the brand name of the product in the beverage container; (2) 
580 primary control or influence over the design of the product in the beverage container; (3) primary 
581 control or influence over the design specifications of the beverage container; 
582  ii. Any entity that has a legally recognized corporate relationship (i.e. parent/subsidiary or 
583 affiliate relationship) with a product manufacturer shall be allowed to assume the responsibilities 
584 of the product manufacturer as they relate to the requirements of this Act. 
585  (h) “Retailer” means a person who sells a beverage in a beverage container to a 
586 consumer; 
587  (i) “Single use”, means intended for disposal after one use and used for serving or 
588 transporting a prepared, ready-to-consume product, and is not intended for multiple trips or 
589 rotations by being returned to the producer for refill or reused for the same purpose for which it 
590 was conceived. 
591  Section 2. Prohibition 
592  (a) On and after January 1, 2024, a retailer shall not sell or offer for sale, in the state, a 
593 single-use beverage container with a beverage cap, unless the container meets one of the 
594 following conditions: (i) the beverage cap is tethered to the container in a manner that prevents 
595 the separation of the cap from the container when the cap is removed from the container; (ii) The 

30 of 31 596 beverage cap includes an opening from which the beverage can be consumed while the cap is 
597 screwed onto or otherwise contiguously affixed to the container; 
598  (b) Metal caps or lids with plastic seals shall not be considered to be made from plastic. 
599 Glass and metal beverage containers that have caps and lids made from plastic shall not be 
600 included in this act; 
601  SECTION 12. Requirements for the Removal of Toxic Substances in Beverage 
602 Containers, Food Ware, and Food Ware Accessories 
603  (1) Definitions: 
604  (a) “Beverage container”, means a prepackaged container designed to hold a beverage 
605 that is made of any material, including glass, plastic, and metal, cartons, pouches, and aseptic 
606 packaging. 
607  (b) “Food ware accessories”, include food serviceware such as straws, stirrers, cup spill 
608 plugs, cup sleeves, condiments and condiment packets, utensils (including chopsticks), cocktail 
609 sticks/picks, toothpicks, napkins, and other similar accessory or accompanying food service ware 
610 used as part of food or beverage service or packaging. 
611  (c) “Food ware”. means any single use or reusable containers that food is served in or 
612 sold in. 
613  (d) “Food packaging” means any packaging that comes into direct contact with food that 
614 will eventually be consumed by human beings or animals. 

31 of 31 615  (2) Beginning two years after adoption of this bill, no person or entity may sell, offer for 
616 sale, or distributed into the state any beverage container, food ware accessories, food ware, or 
617 food packaging containing the following toxic substances: 
618  (a) Ortho-phthalates, (b) Bisphenols, (c) Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), (d) 
619 Lead and lead compounds, (e) Hexavalent chromium and compounds, (f) Cadmium and 
620 cadmium compounds, (g) Mercury and mercury compounds, (h) Benzophenone and its 
621 derivatives, (i) Halogenated flame retardants, (j) Perchlorate, (k) Formaldehyde, (l) Toluene, (m) 
622 Antimony and compounds, and (n) UV 328 (2-(2H-benzotriazol-2-yl)-4,6-di-tert-pentylphenol). 
623  (3) Beginning two years after the Start Date, no person or entity shall sell, offer for sale, 
624 or distribute for use in this state any Beverage Container containing (a) polyvinyl chloride, (b) 
625 polystyrene, or (c) polycarbonate. 
626  (4) Beginning three years after the start date, and every three years thereafter, the 
627 Department of Environmental Protection shall designate at least ten additional toxic substances 
628 or families of toxic substances that may no longer be used in Beverage Containers unless the 
629 Department of Environmental Protection determines there are not ten toxic substances of 
630 families of toxic substances that are required to be banned from use in beverage containers. 
631  (5) Any producer that violates this section shall be subject to a fine for each violation not 
632 to exceed fifty thousand dollars per violation. For the purposes of this section, each product line 
633 that is sold, offered for sale, or distributed to consumers, via retail commerce, in the state, 
634 including through an internet transaction violation shall be considered a violation. 
635  SECTION 13. The provisions of this bill shall take effect one year after passage unless 
636 otherwise specified.